Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 2
H

AZARDOUS SITE RESPONSE

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Hazardous site response, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-19.

Law reviews.

-
For article on the Georgia Hazardous Site Response Act, see 44 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (1992).
For note on 1992 enactment of this part, see 9 Ga. St. U.L Rev. 190 (1992). For note on 1993 amendment of this part, see 10 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 55 (1993).

12-8-90. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Hazardous Site Response Act."

(Code 1981, §

12-8-90

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5.)

Law reviews.

-
For survey article on construction law for the period from June 1, 2002 through May 31, 2003, see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 85 (2003). For article, "Georgia's Hazardous Site Response Act: Growing Pains for Georgia's Baby Superfund," see 9 Ga. St. B.J. 32 (2004). For annual survey of administrative law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2005). For annual survey of zoning and land use law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 447 (2005). For annual survey of real property law, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 367 (2006).

12-8-91. Declaration of policy and legislative intent.

It is declared to be the public policy of the State of Georgia, in furtherance of its responsibility to protect the public health, safety, and well-being of its citizens and to protect and enhance the quality of its environment, to require corrective action for releases of hazardous wastes, hazardous constituents, and hazardous substances, without regard to when such releases may have occurred, into the environment that may pose a threat to human health or the environment and to provide incentives for the reduction of the amount of hazardous wastes generated or managed in the state. Additionally, the purpose of this part is to reduce the generation of hazardous wastes in this state and to encourage hazardous waste generators, prior to considering landfill disposal, to consider the following measures in descending order of preference:

Reduce the amount of wastes generated through improvement in industrial processes;

Isolate hazardous materials from mixtures in which they occur;

Reuse and recycle wastes in accordance with state and federal requirements;

Transfer wastes through clearing-houses so that they may be recycled in industrial processes;

Detoxify or neutralize wastes into less harmful substances or destroy such wastes; and

Store hazardous waste residues in aboveground facilities using encapsulation and monitoring.

The General Assembly declares its intent to fund the execution of the public policy set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section by and through the division with the fees established and collected by the division pursuant to subsection (e) of Code Section

12-2-2

, subsection (e) of Code Section

12-8-39

, subsection (d) of Code Section

12-8-68

, and Code Section

12-8-95.1

. The General Assembly further declares its intent to ensure that the funding provided by fees on hazardous waste management activities and hazardous substance reporting and by owners and operators of solid waste disposal facilities pursuant to those Code sections and through the collection of civil penalties will not be diverted for any purpose other than the administration of this article by the division, including reviewing and overseeing investigations, corrective action, and other actions by federal agencies required under this article and supporting the reduction of hazardous waste and pollution prevention activities by federal agencies; the prevention of pollution, including reduction of hazardous wastes generated; and the effectuation of corrective action at sites that may threaten human health or the environment where hazardous wastes, hazardous constituents, or hazardous substances have been disposed of or released. Appropriation of funds to the department for inclusion in the hazardous waste trust fund continued in existence by subsection (a) of Code Section

12-8-95

shall be deemed consistent with this declaration of legislative intent.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-91

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5; Ga. L. 2002, p. 927, § 2.)

Law reviews.

-
For note on the 2002 amendment of this Code section, see 19 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 54 (2002).

12-8-92. Definitions.

Unless otherwise defined in this part, the definition of all terms included in Code Section 12-8-62 shall be applicable to this part. As used in this part, the term:

"Corrective action contractor" means any person contracting with the division to perform any activities authorized to be paid from the hazardous waste trust fund.

"Environment" means:

The navigable waters, the waters of the contiguous zone, and the ocean waters of which the natural resources are under the exclusive management authority of the United States under the Magnuson Fishery Conservation and Management Act; and

Any other surface water, ground water, drinking water supply, land surface or subsurface strata, or ambient air within the United States or under the jurisdiction of the United States.

"Facility" means:

Any building, structure, installation, equipment, pipe or pipeline, pipe into a sewer or publicly owned treatment works, well, pit, pond, lagoon, impoundment, ditch, landfill, storage container, motor vehicle, rolling stock, or aircraft; or

Any site or area where a hazardous waste, hazardous constituent, or hazardous substance has been deposited, stored, disposed of, placed, or has otherwise come to be located.

This term does not include any consumer product in consumer use but does include any vessel.

"Hazardous substance" means any substance listed on the List of Hazardous Substances and Reportable Quantities, codified as 40 C.F.R., Part 302, Table 302.4, in force and effect on February 1, 2010, or any substance listed on the List of Extremely Hazardous Substances and Their Threshold Planning Quantities, codified as 40 C.F.R., Part 355, Appendix A, in force and effect on February 1, 2010.

"Inventory" means the hazardous site inventory compiled and updated by the division pursuant to Code Section 12-8-97.

"Onshore facility" means any facility of any kind including, but not limited to, motor vehicles and rolling stock located in, on, or under any land or nonnavigable waters within the United States.

"Owner" or "operator" means:

In the case of a vessel, any person owning, operating, or chartering by demise such vessel;

In the case of an onshore facility or an offshore facility, any person owning or operating such facility; and

In the case of any facility, title or control of which was conveyed due to bankruptcy, foreclosure, tax delinquency, abandonment, or similar means to a unit of state or local government, any person who owned, operated, or otherwise controlled activities at such facility immediately beforehand.

Such term does not include a person who holds indicia of ownership primarily to protect said person's security interest in the facility or who acts in good faith solely in a fiduciary capacity and who did not actively participate in the management, disposal, or release of hazardous wastes, hazardous constituents, or hazardous substances from the facility. Such term does not include a unit of state or local government which acquired ownership or control involuntarily through bankruptcy, tax delinquency, abandonment, or other circumstances in which the government involuntarily acquires title by virtue of its function as sovereign; provided, however, that this exclusion shall not apply to any state or local government which has caused or contributed to the release of a hazardous waste, hazardous constituent, or hazardous substance from the facility.

"Person" means an individual, trust, firm, joint-stock company, corporation, partnership, association, authority, county, municipality, commission, political subdivision of this state, or any agency, board, department, or bureau of any other state or of the federal government.

"Person who has contributed or who is contributing to a release" means:

The owner or operator of a facility;

Any person who at the time of disposal of any hazardous waste, hazardous constituent, or hazardous substance owned or operated any facility at which such hazardous waste, hazardous constituent, or hazardous substance was disposed of;

Any person who by contract, agreement, or otherwise arranged for disposal or treatment of or arranged with a transporter for transport for disposal or treatment of hazardous wastes, hazardous constituents, or hazardous substances owned or possessed by such person or by any other party or entity at any facility owned or operated by another party or entity and containing such hazardous wastes, hazardous constituents, or hazardous substances. A person who arranged for the recycling of recovered materials consisting solely of scrap paper, scrap plastic, scrap glass, scrap textiles, scrap rubber other than whole tires, scrap metal or spent lead-acid, nickel-acid, nickel-cadmium, and other batteries, and not consisting of any residue from a pollution control device, shall not be deemed to have arranged for treatment or disposal under this subparagraph; and

Any person who accepts or accepted any hazardous wastes, hazardous constituents, or hazardous substances for transport to disposal or treatment facilities or sites selected by such person, from or at which facility or site there is a release of a hazardous waste, a hazardous constituent, or a hazardous substance.

"Pollution prevention" means:

The elimination at the source of the use, generation, or release of hazardous constituents, hazardous substances, or hazardous wastes; or

Reduction at the source in the quantity and toxicity of such substances.

"Release" means any intentional or unintentional act or omission resulting in the spilling, leaking, pumping, pouring, emitting, emptying, discharging, injecting, escaping, leaching, dumping, or disposing into the environment, including without limitation the abandonment or discarding of barrels, containers, and other closed receptacles, of any hazardous waste, hazardous constituent, or hazardous substance; provided, however, that such term shall not include any release which results in exposure to persons solely within a workplace, with respect to a claim which such persons may assert against the employer of such persons; emissions from the engine exhaust of any motor vehicle, rolling stock, aircraft, vessel, or pipeline pumping station; or the normal application of fertilizer.

"Site" means that portion of the owner's contiguous property and any other owner's property affected by a release exceeding a reportable quantity.

"Small quantity generator" means a hazardous waste generator who generates greater than 220 pounds but less than 2,200 pounds of hazardous waste in one month, as provided by rules promulgated by the board in accordance with this article.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-92

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5; Ga. L. 1993, p. 500, § 3; Ga. L. 1994, p. 483, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 319, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 993, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 275, § 3-4/HB 1320; Ga. L. 2010, p. 531, § 5/SB 78; Ga. L. 2010, p. 828, § 2/SB 490.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1994, "constituent" was substituted for "constitutent" near the end of subparagraph (9)(D).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2006, p. 275,

§

1-1/HB 1320, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall be known and may be cited as the 'Comprehensive Litter Prevention and Abatement Act of 2006.'"

Ga. L. 2006, p. 275,

§

5-1/HB 1320, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall become effective April 21, 2006, for purposes of adopting local ordinances to become effective on or after July 1, 2006.

Law reviews.

-
For article, "Structuring Corporate and Real Estate Transactions Involving Contamination," see 4 Ga. St. B.J. 14 (1998).

12-8-93. Powers and duties of board.

In the performance of its duties, and in addition to the powers set forth in Code Section 12-8-64, the board shall have the power to adopt, promulgate, modify, amend, and repeal rules and regulations to implement and enforce the provisions of this part as the board may deem necessary to provide for corrective action for releases of hazardous wastes, hazardous constituents, and hazardous substances into the environment that pose a present or future danger to human health or the environment and to provide incentives for the reduction of the amount of hazardous wastes generated or managed in the state. Such rules and regulations may be applicable to the state as a whole or may vary from region to region, as may be appropriate to facilitate the accomplishment of the provisions, purposes, and policies of this part.

The board's rules and regulations shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

Rules and regulations governing the reporting of releases of hazardous wastes, hazardous constituents, and hazardous substances, including rules and regulations governing reportable quantities;

Rules and regulations governing the investigation, cleanup, and corrective action at sites where hazardous wastes, hazardous constituents, or hazardous substances have been disposed of or released regardless of the date when such disposal or release occurred, including rules and regulations establishing cleanup standards;

Rules and regulations governing procedures for placement of sites on and removal of sites from the hazardous site inventory required under the provisions of Code Section

12-8-97

;

Rules and regulations governing procedures and criteria for making a determination whether property requires corrective action pursuant to paragraph (8) of subsection (a) of Code Section

12-8-97

;

Rules and regulations governing procedures for the filing in the deed records of the superior courts of additional affidavits concerning property for which an initial affidavit has been filed pursuant to Code Section 12-8-97; and

Rules and regulations governing the waiver of hazardous waste management fees and hazardous substance reporting fees as provided in subsection (i) of Code Section

12-8-95.1

.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-93

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5; Ga. L. 1993, p. 500, § 4; Ga. L. 1997, p. 564, § 1.)

12-8-94. (For effective date, see note) Powers and duties of director.

In addition to the powers and duties specified in Code Section 12-8-65, the director shall have and may exercise the following powers and duties:

To make determinations, in accordance with procedures and criteria established by the board, as to whether property requires corrective action pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (8) of subsection (a) of Code Section 12-8-97;

To ensure that corrective action is taken for releases of hazardous wastes, hazardous constituents, or hazardous substances into the environment that pose a present or future danger to human health or the environment;

To collect fees for hazardous waste management activities and hazardous substance reporting;

To administer the hazardous waste trust fund and expend the principal and interest of such trust fund;

To appoint a hazardous waste trust fund advisory committee and to consult with that committee in developing rules and regulations regarding criteria for compilation of the hazardous site inventory, site priorities, uses of the fund, cleanup standards, and deed notations. At a minimum, the director shall appoint to the committee four representatives from local government, four representatives from business and industry, and four representatives from other interested parties. Upon promulgation of rules and regulations in accordance with this part, the director shall no longer be required to consult with the committee; provided, however, that the director shall consult with the committee from time to time as necessary to adopt, promulgate, modify, amend, or repeal rules and regulations in accordance with this part; and

The director shall have the authority to perfect, foreclose, negotiate, settle, release or cancel any lien filed under subsection (e) of Code Section 12-8-96, where such action is in the best interest of the state.

The powers and duties described in subsection (a) of this Code section may be exercised and performed by the director through such duly authorized agents and employees as the director deems necessary and proper.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-94

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5; Ga. L. 1993, p. 500, § 5; Ga. L. 1994, p. 483, § 4; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1050, § 2.)

Delayed effective date.

- The second 1994 amendment, by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1101, in subsection (a), deleted "and" from the end of paragraph (4), substituted "; and" for the period at the end of paragraph (5), and added a paragraph (6) which would read: "To request the Georgia State Financing and Investment Commission for the issuance of public debt to fund corrective action pursuant to this part; provided, however, that any moneys recovered from persons found to be legally liable for such corrective action shall be used to reduce any such public debt incurred." Ga. L. 1994, p. 1101,

§

6, provided that the amendment to this Code section by that Act "shall become effective only upon the effective date of a duly ratified amendment to the Constitution authorizing the state to incur indebtedness to fund activities associated with the investigation, detoxification, removal, and disposal of any hazardous wastes, hazardous constituents, or hazardous substances at certain sites." As of August 2020, no vote had been taken on the constitutional amendment, and the Code section set out above does not reflect the amendment by that Act.

12-8-95. Hazardous waste trust fund.

There shall continue in existence the hazardous waste trust fund. The hazardous waste trust fund shall be funded in accordance with subsection (b) of Code Section 12-8-91. All moneys deposited in the fund shall be deemed expended and contractually obligated and shall not lapse to the general fund. The director shall serve as trustee of the hazardous waste trust fund.

The moneys deposited in the hazardous waste trust fund may be expended by the director as follows:

For activities associated with the investigation, detoxification, removal, and disposal of any hazardous wastes, hazardous constituents, or hazardous substances at sites where corrective action is necessary to mitigate a present or future danger to human health or the environment;

For emergency actions the director considers necessary to protect public health, safety, or the environment whenever there is a release of hazardous wastes, hazardous constituents, or hazardous substances;

For activities of the division associated with the administration of this part, including reviewing and overseeing investigations, corrective action, and other actions by federal agencies required under this article and supporting the reduction of hazardous waste and pollution prevention activities by federal agencies;

In accordance with rules promulgated by the board, for financing of the state and local share of the costs associated with the investigation, remediation, and postclosure care and maintenance of sites placed on the National Priority List pursuant to the federal Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, as amended, or sites placed on the hazardous site inventory pursuant to Code Section 12-8-97; provided, however, that the director shall ensure that beginning July 1, 2003, and annually in each following year, an amount equal to at least one-half of the sum of annual collections made pursuant to subsection (e) of Code Section 12-8-39 and appropriated to the department in accordance with subsection (b) of Code Section 12-8-91 shall be available to be used for the purposes of this paragraph; provided, further, that if a county or municipal corporation has been or is the owner of or operator of such site, not less than $500,000 of such costs shall be paid from the hazardous waste trust fund; and

For activities administered by the director associated with pollution prevention, including reduction of hazardous wastes generated in this state.

The director may require the demonstration of financial responsibility as a condition of an order requiring corrective action for the release of hazardous wastes, hazardous constituents, or hazardous substances.

If the director determines that corrective action has not been carried out as required by a condition of an order of the director to the reasonable satisfaction of the director, the director may implement the applicable financial responsibility instruments. The proceeds from any applicable financial responsibility instruments shall be deposited in the hazardous waste trust fund.

In any case where a person is in bankruptcy, reorganization, or other arrangement pursuant to the federal Bankruptcy Code or where, with reasonable diligence, jurisdiction in any state court or any federal court cannot be obtained over a person likely to be solvent at the time of judgment, any claim arising from conduct for which evidence of financial responsibility must be provided under this Code section may be asserted directly against the guarantor providing such evidence of financial responsibility. In the case of any action pursuant to this subsection, such guarantor shall be entitled to invoke all rights and defenses which would have been available to the person if any action had been brought against the owner or operator by the claimant and which would have been available to the guarantor if an action had been brought against the guarantor by the owner or operator.

The total liability of any guarantor shall be limited to the aggregate amount which the guarantor has provided as evidence of financial responsibility to the owner or operator under this Code section. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit any other state or federal statutory, contractual, or common-law liability of a guarantor to a person including, but not limited to, the liability of such guarantor for bad faith either in negotiating or in failing to negotiate the settlement of any claim. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to diminish the liability of any person under Section 107 or 111 of the federal Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, as amended, or any other applicable law.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-95

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 12; Ga. L. 2002, p. 927, § 3; Ga. L. 2004, p. 631, § 12; Ga. L. 2013, p. 856, § 3/HB 276.)

Law reviews.

-
For note on the 2002 amendment of this Code section, see 19 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 59 (2002).

12-8-95.1. Hazardous waste management fees and hazardous substance reporting fees.

The division is authorized and directed to charge and collect the fees for hazardous waste management activities and hazardous substance reporting fees as provided in this subsection. As used in this Code section, the term "hazardous waste" shall not include any material excluded by 40 C.F.R. Part 261 of the Code of Federal Regulations. Every large quantity generator and every small quantity generator shall pay the greater of $115.00 per calendar year or the total of the hazardous waste management fees, and every person who is required to report pursuant to Section 313 of Title III of the federal Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986 shall pay the annual hazardous substance reporting fees, imposed as follows:

Every large quantity generator of hazardous waste shall pay an annual fee of $23.00 per ton for hazardous waste shipped off site for disposal or incineration, $18.40 per ton for hazardous waste shipped off site for treatment or storage, and $10.35 per ton for hazardous waste shipped off site for treatment by being burned for energy recovery in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to Part 1 of this article; provided, however, that no large quantity generator shall be liable for off-site hazardous waste management fees exceeding $75,000.00 in any calendar year. In no event shall any person be liable for an off-site hazardous waste management fee on any hazardous waste for which an off-site hazardous waste management fee has previously been paid;

Every large quantity generator of hazardous waste shall pay an annual fee of $11.50 per ton for hazardous waste disposed of or incinerated on site, $4.60 per ton for hazardous waste treated or stored on site, and $2.90 per ton for hazardous waste treated on site by being burned for energy recovery in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to Part 1 of this article; provided, however, that no large quantity generator shall be liable for on-site hazardous waste management fees for disposal or incineration, treatment or storage, or treatment by burning for energy recovery in any calendar year exceeding the following amounts and according to the following schedule:

Twenty-five thousand dollars for such payments due on July 1, 1993, and on July 1, 1994;

Fifty thousand dollars for such payments, excluding payments for the on-site treatment of waste water which is a hazardous waste, due on July 1, 1995, and on July 1, 1996;

Seventy-five thousand dollars for such payments, excluding payments for the on-site treatment of waste water which is a hazardous waste, due on and after July 1, 1997;

One thousand five hundred dollars for waste water which is a hazardous waste which is treated on site for payments due on July 1, 1995;

Three thousand dollars for waste water which is a hazardous waste treated on site for payments due on July 1, 1996; and

Seven thousand five hundred dollars for waste water which is a hazardous waste treated on site for payments due on and after July 1, 1997.

For the purposes of this paragraph, a generator who generates waste water which is a hazardous waste shall not be required to count such hazardous waste in determining its status as a large quantity generator, a small quantity generator, or a conditionally exempt small quantity generator. For the purposes of this paragraph, dilution of waste water that is a hazardous waste shall be considered treatment subject to the fees established by this paragraph. A large quantity generator which pays fees for the off-site management of hazardous waste under paragraph (1) of this subsection for a hazardous waste which was previously managed on site shall not pay the applicable on-site management fee for that hazardous waste;

Every person who receives hazardous waste generated outside this state shall pay an annual fee of $23.00 per ton for hazardous waste disposed of or incinerated, $18.40 per ton for hazardous waste treated or stored, and $10.35 per ton for hazardous waste treated by being burned for energy recovery in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to Part 1 of this article; provided, however, that no person shall be liable for importation fees exceeding $75,000.00 per out-of-state generator in any calendar year. In no case shall any person who receives hazardous waste from any person outside this state and who pays an importation fee on such waste pursuant to this paragraph be liable for the off-site hazardous waste management fees required by paragraph (1) of this subsection. Persons who receive hazardous waste generated outside this state are not required to pay the fees required by this paragraph for those wastes generated by conditionally exempt small quantity generators which are located outside this state. For the purposes of this paragraph, a "conditionally exempt small quantity generator" means a generator who generates 220 pounds or less of hazardous waste in one month, as provided by rules promulgated by the board in accordance with this article; and

Each person who is required to report pursuant to Section 313 of Title III of the federal Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986 shall pay to the division an annual hazardous substance reporting fee as follows:

A facility with no reported release shall pay no fee;

A facility with a reported release of less than 1,000 pounds during the calendar year shall pay a fee of $575.00 for that calendar year;

A facility with a reported release equal to or greater than 1,000 pounds but less than 10,000 pounds during the calendar year shall pay a fee of $1,150.00 for that calendar year; and

A facility with a reported release equal or greater than 10,000 pounds during the calendar year shall pay a fee of $1,725.00 for that calendar year.

All hazardous waste and hazardous substance fees required by subsection (a) of this Code section shall be paid to the division for transfer into the state treasury to the credit of the general fund. The division shall collect such fees until the unencumbered principal balance of the hazardous waste trust fund equals or exceeds $25 million, at which time no hazardous waste or hazardous substance fees shall be levied until the balance in that fund is less than or equal to an unencumbered balance of $12.5 million, in which case the levy and collection of hazardous waste fees shall resume at the beginning of the next calendar year following the year in which such unencumbered balance occurs. The director shall provide written notice to all large quantity generators and hazardous waste treatment, storage, and disposal facilities and all persons who are required to report pursuant to Section 313 of Title III of the federal Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986 at such time as the director receives notice that the unencumbered principal balance of the fund equals or exceeds $25 million or is equal to or less than $12.5 million.

All hazardous waste fees levied under this Code section shall be based on the amounts of hazardous waste managed or imported within the preceding calendar year. Such fees for the period July 1, 1992, through December 31, 1992, shall be paid to the division not later than July 1, 1993. All subsequent hazardous waste fees shall be paid not later than the first day of July of each year for the preceding calendar year.

All hazardous substance fees levied under this Code section shall be based on the hazardous substances reported for the preceding calendar year. All hazardous substance fees shall be paid not later than the first day of July of each year for the preceding calendar year.

Persons who make payments of fees levied by this Code section later than 30 days after the due date specified in subsection (c) of this Code section shall pay a penalty of 15 percent of the balance due and shall pay interest on the unpaid balance at the rate imposed by law for delinquent taxes due to the state. Delinquent fees may be collected in a civil action instituted in the name of the director. In addition to the 15 percent penalty and the interest that may be collected along with the delinquent fees as provided in this subsection, the director shall be entitled to collect all costs, including administrative costs, and legal expenses incurred by the state in connection with its collection efforts.

Hazardous waste which is generated by any of the following means is exempted from the fees required by this Code section:

Corrective action required by an order, permit, or approved closure plan issued pursuant to Part 1 of this article;

Voluntary corrective action required by any person in accordance with applicable laws and regulations; and

Response actions required under the federal Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, as amended.

The following persons shall not be required to pay the hazardous substance reporting fees required by this Code section:

Persons who report pursuant to Section 313 of Title III of the federal Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986 only for substances not designated as regulated substances pursuant to rules and regulations of the board; and

Persons who report pursuant to Section 313 of Title III of the federal Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986 only for petroleum fuels, lubricants, and hydraulic fluids and components thereof that are designated as regulated substances pursuant to rules and regulations of the board.

Unless fee requirements established in this Code section are reimposed by the General Assembly, no such fees shall be levied after July 1, 2022.

In accordance with rules promulgated by the board pursuant to paragraph (6) of subsection (b) of Code Section 12-8-93, the director is authorized to grant a waiver of a portion of the hazardous waste management fees and hazardous substance reporting fees provided by subsection (a) of this Code section not to exceed a 25 percent reduction per year for a maximum of three years for any company as an incentive upon the recommendation of the director of the Pollution Prevention Assistance Division made in conjunction with programs and activities designed to encourage industries in the state to reduce their generation of wastes, including but not limited to programs established to recognize and reward pollution performance and environmental improvement.

Beginning July 1, 2003, and continuing annually thereafter, federal agencies shall pay the hazardous waste management fees required by this Code section provided an amount not less than the sum of all fees collected from federal agencies is appropriated annually to the department and used in accordance with subsection (b) of Code Section

12-8-91

and used for the purposes set forth in paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of Code Section

12-8-95

.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-95

.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5; Ga. L. 1993, p. 500, § 6; Ga. L. 1994, p. 483, § 5; Ga. L. 1996, p. 993, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 564, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 927, § 4; Ga. L. 2013, p. 856, § 4/HB 276; Ga. L. 2018, p. 228, § 2/HB 792; Ga. L. 2019, p. 261, § 3/HB 220.)

The 2019 amendment,

effective June 30, 2019, substituted "July 1, 2022" for "July 1, 2019" at the end of subsection (h).

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, "40 C.F.R. Part 261" was substituted for "40 CFR Part 261" in the second sentence of subsection (a).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2002, "paragraph (6) of subsection (b) of Code Section 12-8-93" was substituted for "paragraph (6) of Code Section 12-8-93" in subsection (i).

Law reviews.

-
For review of 1996 waste management legislation, see 13 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 54 (1996). For note on the 2002 amendment of this Code section, see 19 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 59 (2002).

12-8-96. Corrective action upon release of hazardous wastes, hazardous constituents, or hazardous substances; notice; administrative consent order; expenditure of funds from trust fund.

Whenever the director has reason to believe that there is or has been a release of hazardous wastes, hazardous constituents, or hazardous substances into the environment, regardless of the time at which release of such hazardous wastes, hazardous constituents, or hazardous substances occurred, and has reason to believe that such release poses a danger to health or the environment, the director shall make a reasonable effort to identify each person who has contributed or who is contributing to such a release. The director shall then notify each such person in writing of the opportunity to perform voluntarily corrective action in accordance with an administrative consent order entered into with the director within such period of time as may be specified by the director in written correspondence to the person. If the person fails or refuses to enter into an administrative consent order with the director within the period of time specified by the director, the director may issue an order directed to any such person. The order may direct that necessary corrective action be taken within a reasonable time to be prescribed in the order.

If a person fails to comply with such an order or if all necessary corrective action cannot be obtained from the responsible person or persons, the director may undertake corrective action utilizing funds from the hazardous waste trust fund.

The division or its corrective action contractors may enter upon the property of any person, at such time and in such manner as deemed necessary by the director, to effectuate the necessary corrective action to protect human health and the environment.

The State of Georgia and the hazardous waste trust fund are relieved from all liability for loss of business, damages, and taking of property associated with the corrective action.

Whenever the director utilizes funds from the hazardous waste trust fund, such expenditure shall constitute a debt to the state. Any such debt, together with interest accruing at a rate of 12 percent per annum, shall constitute a lien on the real property for which such funds are being expended or have been expended. In order to perfect the lien created by this article, the director shall file a claim of lien with the clerk of the superior court in the county in which the real property is located. Such claim of lien shall, at a minimum, accurately describe the property on which the lien is imposed and shall state the type of corrective action, the authority pursuant to which the corrective action is being performed, the date the corrective action began, the cost to date of the claim, and the estimated total cost. Such claim of lien may be updated from time to time. The director shall mail a copy of the claim of lien to the owner of the real property and to all other persons the director believes to be liable for the cost of the corrective action. The clerk of the superior court shall index the claim of lien in the land records of the court. The filing of the claim of lien shall be notice to all persons of the state's lien against the real property. The lien provided by this Code section shall be superior to all other liens except liens for taxes and other prior perfected recorded liens or claims of record. The lien created by this Code section may be foreclosed as provided in Code Section

44-14-530

. All funds obtained from the foreclosure or settlement of any lien filed under this Code section shall be deposited into the hazardous waste trust fund subject to the provisions of Code Section

45-12-92

. No transferral of title, sale, or execution of lien, whether judicial or nonjudicial, shall divest the lien provided by this Code section. However, the lien provided for in this subsection shall not be available where the present owner of the real property otherwise subject to such lien did not cause or contribute to a release which resulted in the expenditure of hazardous waste trust funds upon the property, unless that owner knew or in the exercise of reasonable diligence should have known that the release was occurring during his or her period of ownership or that the release had occurred prior to his or her acquisition of ownership.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-96

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1050, § 1.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, "lien" was substituted for "liens" in the eighth sentence of subsection (e).